Hawaii statutes.
§653-14 Warrants issued to plaintiff, when.
In case there is certified to the garnishee a judgment for the plaintiff, from
or to which no appeal or exception, at the time of its rendition, has been
noted, it shall be incumbent upon the garnishee to draw, sign, and deliver to
the plaintiff a warrant or warrants payable to the order of the plaintiff for
such sum or sums as theretofore have been sequestered and not drawn against in
pursuance of the action if the judgment equals or exceeds such sum or sums. If
the amount so sequestered and not drawn against does not suffice to extinguish
the judgment, then the sequestration and delivery to the plaintiff by the
garnishee of a warrant payable to the order of the plaintiff shall continue
from week to week, or from month to month, until the judgment, with legal
interest, is fully paid, or until the beneficiary quits the service of and
dissolves the beneficiary's relation to the government upon which the
sequestration is founded. [L 1890, c 50, §12; am L 1903, c 53, §5; RL 1925,
§2858; RL 1935, §4303; RL 1945, §10334; RL 1955, §238-14; HRS §653-14; gen ch
1985]

Case Notes

Duty to issue. 24 H. 16 (1917).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next